fr: Variété de goyave: Goyave-pomme; Goyave crème mexicaine; Goyave-ananas; Goyave rose; Goyave malaise rouge; Goyave-fraise; Goyave blanche; Goyave jaune; Autre
nb: Guava-variant: Epleguava; Meksikansk kremguava; Ananasguava; Rosa guava; Rød malaysisk guava; Jordbærguava; Hvit guava; Gul guava; Annet
zh-CN: 番石榴品种: 苹果番石榴; 墨西哥奶油番石榴; 菠萝番石榴; 粉红番石榴; 马来西亚红番石榴; 草莓番石榴; 白肉番石榴; 黄肉番石榴; 其他
pt-PT: Variedade de goiaba: Goiaba-maçã; Goiaba creme mexicana; Feijoa (Pineapple guava); Goiaba rosa; Goiaba vermelha da Malásia; Araçá-rosa (Strawberry guava); Goiaba branca; Goiaba amarela; Outra
pl: Odmiana gujawy: Gujawa jabłkowa; Gujawa meksykańska kremowa; Gujawa ananasowa; Gujawa różowa; Czerwona gujawa malezyjska; Gujawa truskawkowa; Gujawa biała; Gujawa żółta; Inna
sl-SI: Sorta gvajave: Jabolčna guava; Mehiška kremna guava; Ananasova guava; Roza guava; Rdeča malezijska guava; Jagodna guava; Bela guava; Rumena guava; Drugo
ro-RO: Soi de guava: Guava măr; Guava crem mexicană; Guava ananas; Guava roz; Guava roșie de Malaezia; Guava căpșună; Guava albă; Guava galbenă; Altele
th: พันธุ์ฝรั่ง: ฝรั่งแอปเปิ้ล; ฝรั่งเม็กซิกันครีม; ฝรั่งสับปะรด; ฝรั่งสีชมพู; ฝรั่งแดงมาเลย์; ฝรั่งสตรอว์เบอร์รี; ฝรั่งสีขาว; ฝรั่งสีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
ru: Сорт гуавы: Яблочная гуава; Мексиканская кремовая гуава; Ананасная гуава; Розовая гуава; Красная малайзийская гуава; Земляничная гуава; Белая гуава; Желтая гуава; Другое
lt-LT: Gvajavos veislė: Tikroji gvajava; Meksikinė kreminė gvajava; Ananasinė gvajava (Feichoja); Rožinė gvajava; Raudonoji malaizietiška gvajava; Braškinė gvajava; Baltoji gvajava; Geltonoji gvajava; Kita
sk-SK: Odroda guavy: Jablková guava; Mexická krémová guava; Ananásová guava; Ružová guava; Červená malajzijská guava; Jahodová guava; Biela guava; Žltá guava; Iné
zh-TW: 番石榴品種: 蘋果芭樂; 墨西哥奶油芭樂; 鳳梨芭樂; 紅心芭樂; 馬來西亞紅芭樂; 草莓芭樂; 白肉芭樂; 黃皮芭樂; 其他
de: Guavensorte: Apfel-Guave; Mexikanische Creme-Guave; Ananas-Guave; Rosa Guave; Rote malaysische Guave; Erdbeer-Guave; Weiße Guave; Gelbe Guave; Sonstige
pt-BR: Modalidade de goiaba: Goiaba-maçã; Goiaba-creme mexicana; Goiaba-abacaxi; Goiaba-rosa; Goiaba-vermelha-da-malásia; Araçá-vermelho; Goiaba-branca; Goiaba-amarela; Outra
ko: 구아바 품종: 애플 구아바; 멕시코 크림 구아바; 파인애플 구아바; 핑크 구아바; 레드 말레이시아 구아바; 스트로베리 구아바; 화이트 구아바; 옐로우 구아바; 기타
sv: Guavasort: Äppelguava; Mexikansk krämguava; Ananasguava; Rosa guava; Röd malaysisk guava; Smultronguava; Vit guava; Gul guava; Övrigt
en: Guava variety: Apple guava; Mexican cream guava; Pineapple guava; Pink guava; Red Malaysian guava; Strawberry guava; White guava; Yellow guava; Other
vi: Giống ổi: Ổi apple; Ổi kem Mexico; Ổi dứa; Ổi ruột hồng; Ổi đỏ Malaysia; Ổi sẻ; Ổi trắng; Ổi vàng; Khác
es: Variedad de guayaba: Guayaba manzana; Guayaba crema mexicana; Guayaba piña; Guayaba rosa; Guayaba roja malaya; Guayaba fresa; Guayaba blanca; Guayaba amarilla; Otro
nl: Guave variëteit: Appelguave; Mexicaanse crème-guave; Ananasguave; Roze guave; Rode Maleisische guave; Aardbeiguave; Witte guave; Gele guave; Overig
da: Guavavariant: Æbleguava; Mexicansk creme-guava; Ananasguava; Pink guava; Rød malaysisk guava; Jordbærguava; Hvid guava; Gul guava; Andet
el: Ποικιλία γκουάβα: Γκουάβα-μήλο; Μεξικάνικη κρεμ γκουάβα; Γκουάβα-ανανάς; Ροζ γκουάβα; Κόκκινη μαλαισιανή γκουάβα; Γκουάβα-φράουλα; Λευκή γκουάβα; Κίτρινη γκουάβα; Άλλο
cs: Odrůda guavy: Kvajáva jablečná; Mexická krémová kvajáva; Ananasová kvajáva; Růžová kvajáva; Červená malajská kvajáva; Jahodová kvajáva; Bílá kvajáva; Žlutá kvajáva; Ostatní
tr: Guava çeşidi: Elma guavası; Meksika krem guavası; Ananas guavası; Pembe guava; Kırmızı Malezya guavası; Çilek guavası; Beyaz guava; Sarı guava; Diğer
it: Varietà di guava: Guava mela; Guava Mexican Cream; Guava ananas; Guava rosa; Guava rossa malese; Guava fragola; Guava bianca; Guava gialla; Altro
hr-HR: Sorta guave: Jabuka guava; Meksička kremasta guava; Ananas guava; Ružičasta guava; Crvena malezijska guava; Jagoda guava; Bijela guava; Žuta guava; Ostalo
ja: グアバの種類: アップルグアバ; メキシカンクリームグアバ; パイナップルグアバ; ピンクグアバ; レッドマレーシアングアバ; ストロベリーグアバ; ホワイトグアバ; イエローグアバ; その他
fi: Guavalajike: Omenaguava; Meksikolainen kermaguava; Ananasguava; Vaaleanpunainen guava; Punainen malesialainen guava; Mansikkaguava; Valkoinen guava; Keltainen guava; Muu
hu: Guava fajtája: Alma guava; Mexikói krémes guava; Ananász guava; Rózsaszín guava; Vörös maláj guava; Eper guava; Fehér guava; Sárga guava; Egyéb
bg-BG: Сорт гуава: Ябълкова гуава; Мексиканска кремава гуава; Ананасова гуава; Розова гуава; Червена малайзийска гуава; Ягодова гуава; Бяла гуава; Жълта гуава; Други